Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Adoption

199.470.
Petition for adoption of child — Parties — Residence requirement — Approval of secretary — Exceptions.

Any person who is eighteen (18) years of age and who is a resident of this state or who has resided in this state for twelve (12) months next before filing may file a petition for leave to adopt a child in the Circuit Court of the county in which the petitioner resides.

If the petitioner is married, the husband or wife shall join in a petition for leave to adopt a child unless the petitioner is married to a biological parent of the child to be adopted, except that if the court finds the requirement of a joint petition would serve to deny the child a suitable home, the requirement may be waived.

If a child is placed for adoption by the cabinet, by an agency licensed by the cabinet, or with written approval by the secretary of the cabinet, the petition may be filed at the time of placement. In all other adoptions, the petition shall not be filed until the child has resided continuously in the home of the petitioner for at least ninety (90) days immediately prior to the filing of the adoption petition.

No petition for adoption shall be filed unless prior to the filing of the petition the child sought to be adopted has been placed for adoption by a child-placing institution or agency, or by the cabinet, or the child has been placed with written approval of the secretary; but no approval shall be necessary in the case of:

A child sought to be adopted by a blood relative, including a relative of half-blood, first cousin, aunt, uncle, nephew, niece, and a person of a preceding generation as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great; stepparent; stepsibling; or fictive kin; however, the court in its discretion may order a report in accordance with KRS 199.510 and a background check as provided in KRS 199.473(8);

A child received by the proposed adopting parent or parents from an agency without this state with the written consent of the secretary;

A child adopted under the provisions of KRS 199.585(1); or

A child who has been approved under KRS Chapter 615.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 125, § 10; 1962, ch. 211, § 3; 1964, ch. 182, § 1(1) to (5); 1968, ch. 100, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(21); 1974, ch. 121, § 1; 1994, ch. 242, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2005, ch. 68, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 175, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2018 ch. 159, § 4, effective July 14, 2018.

199.471.
Denial of adoption on religious, ethnic, or racial grounds.

Petitions for adoption of children placed for adoption by the cabinet or a licensed child-placing institution or agency shall not be denied on the basis of the religious, ethnic, racial, or interfaith background of the adoptive applicant, unless contrary to the expressed wishes of the biological parent(s).

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 231, § 2.

199.472.
Adoption of children regulated.

The cabinet shall establish criteria to be followed for the adoption of children and promulgate this criteria by administrative regulations.

The cabinet shall file the regulations as provided for in KRS Chapter 13A with the Legislative Research Commission.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 231, § 3.

199.473.
Placement of children by private person — Home study required — Temporary custody — Background check — Removal.

All persons other than a child-placing agency or institution, the department, or persons excepted by KRS 199.470(4) who wish to place or receive a child shall make written application to the secretary for permission to place or receive a child.

Prior to the approval of an application to place or receive a child, the fee required pursuant to subsection (13) of this section shall be paid and a home study shall be completed. The purpose of the home study shall be to review the background of the applicant and determine the suitability of the applicant to receive a child, taking into account at all times the best interest of the child for whom application to receive has been made.

The home study shall be made in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(3) (a)

The home study shall be made in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

The cabinet shall conduct the home study for an applicant whose total gross income is equal to or less than two hundred fifty percent (250%) of the federal poverty level guidelines issued each year by the federal government, unless the applicant submits a written request for the home study to be conducted by a licensed child-placing agency or institution. Upon request, the cabinet shall make information available to an applicant who does not meet the requirements of this paragraph to assist the applicant in obtaining a home study from a licensed child-placing agency approved to provide adoption services.

A licensed child-placing agency approved to provide adoption services shall conduct the home study for an applicant whose gross total income is more than two hundred fifty percent (250%) of the federal poverty level guidelines issued each year by the federal government.

Calculation of family size for this subsection shall include each child requested to be adopted.

The portion of the home study pertaining to the home and family background shall be valid for one (1) year following the date of its completion by an adoption worker.

The adoption worker making the home study shall make a finding in writing recommending either that the application be granted or that the application be denied. The recommendation of the adoption worker shall then be reviewed by the secretary.

Based on the report and recommendation of the adoption worker making the home study, the secretary shall grant or refuse permission for the applicant to place or receive a child as early as practicable, but, in any case, the decision shall be made within sixty (60) days after the receipt of the application. In reaching a decision, the secretary shall be guided by the ability of the persons wishing to receive the child to give the child a suitable home, and shall at all times consider the best interest of the child from a financial, medical, psychological, and psychiatric standpoint.

If the application is refused, the secretary shall in general terms furnish in writing the reasons for his or her refusal.

Any person who seeks temporary custody of a child prior to the secretary’s ruling on an application for adoption shall file a petition seeking temporary custody, with a notice of intent to adopt, with the Circuit Court that will have jurisdiction of the adoption proceedings. The clerk of the court shall send a notice of the filing of the petition to the cabinet. A hearing on the petition shall occur no later than seventy-two (72) hours after the filing of the petition, excluding weekends and holidays. Proceedings under this subsection shall be incorporated into the court’s adoption file. If the adoption is not finalized within six (6) months of the filing of the petition and notice of intent, the court shall conduct a hearing on the status and custody of the child.

Upon a finding by the Circuit Court that the child should be placed prior to the secretary’s ruling on the application, the Circuit Court may grant the applicant temporary custody of the child pending the decision of the secretary. Temporary custody shall not be granted to an applicant unless a background check, including but not limited to a criminal records check by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or the Administrative Office of the Courts and a background check of child abuse and neglect records maintained by the cabinet, has been submitted to and reviewed by the court. The background check required for temporary custody shall be part of the home study required under subsection (2) of this section. If the application is denied by the secretary, the temporary custody order shall be set aside and, upon motion of the cabinet or of the child’s parent or parents, the Circuit Court may order the child returned to the biological parent or parents or the child’s custody may be awarded to the cabinet, another licensed child-placing agency, or other individuals deemed appropriate by the court. This section shall not be deemed to permit the completion of any adoption proceeding without the approval of the secretary and compliance with KRS 615.030, if required.

In any case where the cabinet refuses to approve the placement of a child for adoption when requested by the parent or parents of the child, or refuses the request of any person or persons that a child be placed with that person or those persons for adoption, the decision of the secretary in so refusing shall be final unless within ten (10) days after notice of refusal, the biological or proposed adopting parent or parents shall appeal to the Circuit Court of the county in which the adoption is proposed. No placement shall be disapproved on the basis of the religious, ethnic, racial, or interfaith background of the adoptive applicant, if the placement is made with the consent of the parent.

The cabinet may refuse to approve the placement of a child for adoption if the child’s custodial parent is unwilling for the child to be placed for adoption with the proposed adoptive family. The cabinet may approve or deny the placement, in spite of the fact that the custodial parent or parents are unwilling to be interviewed by the cabinet or other approving entity, or if, after diligent efforts have been made, the adoption worker is unable to locate or interview the custodial parent or parents. The cabinet shall be made a party defendant to the appeal. In the hearing of an appeal, the court shall review the findings of the secretary and shall determine if the secretary has acted arbitrarily, unlawfully, or in a manner that constitutes an abuse of discretion.

If a child who does not fall within the exception provided for in KRS 199.470(4) is placed or received in a home without the court’s review of the background check required under this section or the permission of the secretary for health and family services, or if permission to receive a child has been denied, a representative of the cabinet shall notify in writing or may petition the juvenile session of District Court of the county in which the child is found setting out the facts concerning the child. When the petition has been filed, the court shall take jurisdiction of the child and shall provide for it as it would provide for a dependent, neglected, or abused child under KRS Chapter 620, except that the child may not be placed in the home of the applicants who are to receive the child unless permission to do so is granted by the secretary or the action is ordered by a Kentucky court of competent jurisdiction.

When either the custodial parent or parents of the child to be placed or the persons wishing to receive the child reside out-of-state, the requirement of KRS 615.030, Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, shall be met before the cabinet gives approval for the child’s placement.

The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall be paid a nonrefundable fee of two hundred dollars ($200) upon the filing of the written application for permission to place or receive a child. Payment shall be made by certified or cashier’s check only. All funds collected under this section shall be deposited in a restricted account, which is hereby created, for the purpose of subsidizing an adoptive parent for suitable care of a special-needs child as authorized in KRS 199.555.

Nothing in this statute shall be construed to limit the authority of the cabinet or a child-placing institution or agency to determine the proper disposition of a child committed to it by the juvenile session of District Court or the Circuit Court, prior to the filing of an application to place or receive.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 211, § 3; 1964, ch. 182, § 1(6) to (9); 1972, ch. 231, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(1), (14), (21); 1976, ch. 62, § 98; 1978, ch. 137, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, § 154, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 280, § 144, effective July 15, 1984; 1986, ch. 423, § 187, effective July 1, 1987; 1990, ch. 247, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 242, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 140, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 178, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 175, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 240, effective June 26, 2007; 2018 ch. 159, § 36, effective July 14, 2018.

199.474.
Home study — Administrative regulations.

As used in this section unless the context requires otherwise:

“Cabinet” means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; and

“Home study” has the same meaning as in KRS 615.030, Article II, subsection (6).

The cabinet shall promulgate by administrative regulations the process, procedures, and requirements to ensure that a uniform establishment and understanding of the definition of, and the required documentation within, any home study required pursuant to this chapter is the same for both public and private agencies.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 159, § 8, effective July 14, 2018.

199.475.
Petition by army post resident.

Any person who has been a resident of any United States Army post, military reservation or fort within the State of Kentucky for sixty (60) days, or a resident of this state who has resided on such United States Army post, military reservation or fort together aggregating sixty (60) days before filing the petition, may bring an action for adoption of a child in any county adjacent to said army post or military reservation.

History.
Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 76, § 1; 1976, ch. 352, § 1.

199.480.
Parties defendant in an adoption proceeding — Process — Guardian ad litem.

The following persons shall be made parties defendant in an action for leave to adopt a child:

The child to be adopted;

The biological living parents of a child under eighteen (18), if the child is born in lawful wedlock. If the child is born out of wedlock, its mother; and its father, if one (1) of the following requirements is met:

He is known and voluntarily identified by the mother by affidavit;

He has registered with the cabinet pursuant to KRS 199.503 as a putative father prior to the birth of the child, or if he did not have notice prior to the birth of the child, within twenty-one (21) days after the birth of the child;

He has caused his name to be affixed to the birth certificate of the child;

He has commenced a judicial proceeding claiming parental right;

He has contributed financially to the support of the child, either by paying the medical or hospital bills associated with the birth of the child or financially contributed to the child’s support; or

He has married the mother of the child or has lived openly or is living openly with the child or the person designated on the birth certificate as the biological mother of the child.

The child’s guardian, if it has one.

If the care, custody, and control of the child has been transferred to the cabinet, or any other individual or individuals, institution, or agency, then the cabinet, the other individual or individuals, institution, or agency shall be named a party defendant, unless the individual or individuals, or the institution or agency is also the petitioner.

Each party defendant shall be brought before the court in the same manner as provided in other civil cases except that if the child to be adopted is under fourteen (14) years of age and the cabinet, individual, institution, or agency has custody of the child, the service of process upon the child shall be had by serving a copy of the summons in the action upon the cabinet, individual, institution or agency, any provision of CR 4.04(3) to the contrary notwithstanding.

If the child’s biological living parents, if the child is born in lawful wedlock, or if the child is born out of wedlock, its mother, and if paternity is established in legal action or if an affidavit is filed stating that the affiant is father of the child, its father, are parties defendant, no guardian ad litem need be appointed to represent the child to be adopted.

A putative father shall not be made a party defendant if none of the requirements set forth above have been met, and a biological parent shall not be made a party defendant if the parental rights of that parent have been terminated under KRS Chapter 625, or under a comparable statute of another jurisdiction;

History.
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 125, § 11; 1962, ch. 210, § 27; 1962, ch. 211, § 4; 1974, ch. 51, § 1; 1974, ch. 386, § 35; 1980, ch. 188, § 183, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 16, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 423, § 188, effective July 1, 1987; 1994, ch. 242, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 2018 ch. 159, § 30, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 33, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

199.490.
Contents of adoption petition — Accompanying papers.

The petition shall allege:

The name, date, place of birth, place of residence, and mailing address of each petitioner, and, if married, the date and place of their marriage;

The name, date, place of birth, place of residence, and mailing address, if known, of the child sought to be adopted;

Relationship, if any, of the child to each petitioner;

Full name by which the child shall be known after adoption;

A full description of the property, if any, of the child so far as it is known to the petitioner;

The names of the parents of the child and the address of each living parent, if known. The name of the biological father of a child born out of wedlock shall not be given unless paternity is established in a legal action, or unless an affidavit is filed stating that the affiant is the father of the child. If certified copies of orders terminating parental rights are filed as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the name of any parent whose rights have been terminated shall not be given;

The name and address of the child’s guardian, if any, or of the cabinet, institution, or agency having legal custody of the child;

Any further facts necessary for the location of the person or persons whose consent to the adoption is required, or whom KRS 199.480 requires to be made a party to or notified of the proceeding; and

If any fact required by this subsection to be alleged is unknown to the petitioners, the lack of knowledge shall be alleged.

There shall be filed with the petition certified copies of any orders terminating parental rights. Any consent to adoption shall be filed prior to the entry of the adoption judgment.

If the petitioner was not excepted by KRS 199.470(4), a copy of the written approval of the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or the secretary’s designee shall be filed with the petition.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 125, § 12; 1974, ch. 386, § 36; 1976, ch. 243, § 1; 1994, ch. 242, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 141, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 179, effective June 20, 2005; 2018 ch. 159, § 37, effective July 14, 2018.

199.492.
Attorney not to represent both biological and adoptive parents — Penalty.

In an adoption proceeding, an attorney shall not represent both the biological parents and the prospective adoptive parents.

Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 242, § 20, effective July 15, 1994.

199.493.
Prohibition against payment of attorney’s fees of biological parent without court approval — Penalty.

No adoptive parent, proposed adoptive parent, agency, or intermediary shall pay the attorney’s fees of a biological parent for any purpose related to an adoption action except as approved by the court.

Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 242, § 21, effective July 15, 1994.

199.500.
Consent to adoption.

An adoption shall not be granted without the voluntary and informed consent, as defined in KRS 199.011, of the living parent or parents of a child born in lawful wedlock or the mother of the child born out of wedlock, or the father of the child born out of wedlock if paternity is established in a legal action or if an affidavit is filed stating that the affiant is the father of the child, except that the consent of the living parent or parents shall not be required if:

The parent or parents have been adjudged mentally disabled and the judgment shall have been in effect for not less than one (1) year prior to the filing of the petition for adoption;

The parental rights of the parents have been terminated under KRS Chapter 625;

The living parents are divorced and the parental rights of one (1) parent have been terminated under KRS Chapter 625 and consent has been given by the parent having custody and control of the child; or

The biological parent has not established parental rights as required by KRS 625.065.

A minor parent who is a party defendant may consent to an adoption but a guardian ad litem for the parent shall be appointed.

In the case of a child twelve (12) years of age or older, the consent of the child shall be given in court. The court in its discretion may waive this requirement.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, an adoption may be granted without the consent of the biological living parents of a child if it is pleaded and proved as a part of the adoption proceedings that any of the provisions of KRS 625.090 exist with respect to the child.

An adoption shall not be granted or a consent for adoption be held valid if the consent for adoption is given prior to seventy-two (72) hours after the birth of the child. A voluntary and informed consent may be taken at seventy-two (72) hours after the birth of the child and shall become final and irrevocable seventy-two (72) hours after it is signed.

History.
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 125, § 13; 1974, ch. 386, § 37; 1978, ch. 137, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, § 184, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 396, § 20, effective July 1, 1982; 1982, ch. 141, § 65, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 16, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 423, § 189, effective July 1, 1987; 1994, ch. 242, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 142, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 69, § 2, effective June 21, 2001; 2018 ch. 159, § 42, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 33, § 4, effective June 27, 2019.

199.502.
Conditions necessary for adoption without consent of child’s biological living parents — Court decision — Representation of biological parent.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 199.500(1), an adoption may be granted without the consent of the biological living parents of a child if it is pleaded and proved as part of the adoption proceeding that any of the following conditions exist with respect to the child:

That the parent has abandoned the child for a period of not less than ninety (90) days;

That the parent had inflicted or allowed to be inflicted upon the child, by other than accidental means, serious physical injury;

That the parent has continuously or repeatedly inflicted or allowed to be inflicted upon the child, by other than accidental means, physical injury or emotional harm;

That the parent has been convicted of a felony that involved the infliction of serious physical injury to a child named in the present adoption proceeding;

That the parent, for a period of not less than six (6) months, has continuously or repeatedly failed or refused to provide or has been substantially incapable of providing essential parental care and protection for the child, and that there is no reasonable expectation of improvement in parental care and protection, considering the age of the child;

That the parent has caused or allowed the child to be sexually abused or exploited;

That the parent, for reasons other than poverty alone, has continuously or repeatedly failed to provide or is incapable of providing essential food, clothing, shelter, medical care, or education reasonably necessary and available for the child’s well-being and that there is no reasonable expectation of significant improvement in the parent’s conduct in the immediately foreseeable future, considering the age of the child;

That:

The parent’s parental rights to another child have been involuntarily terminated;

The child named in the present adoption proceeding was born subsequent to or during the pendency of the previous termination; and

The condition or factor which was the basis for the previous termination finding has not been corrected;

That the parent has been convicted in a criminal proceeding of having caused or contributed to the death of another child as a result of physical or sexual abuse or neglect; or

That the parent is a putative father, as defined in KRS 199.503, who fails to register as the minor’s putative father with the putative father registry established under KRS 199.503 or the court finds, after proper service of notice and hearing, that:

The putative father is not the father of the minor;

The putative father has willfully abandoned or willfully failed to care for and support the minor; or

The putative father has willfully abandoned the mother of the minor during her pregnancy and up to the time of her surrender of the minor, or the minor’s placement in the home of the petitioner, whichever occurs first.

Upon the conclusion of proof and argument of counsel, the Circuit Court shall enter findings of fact, conclusions of law, and a decision either:

Granting the adoption without the biological parent’s consent; or

Dismissing the adoption petition, and stating whether the child shall be returned to the biological parent or the child’s custody granted to the state, another agency, or the petitioner.

A biological living parent has the right to legal representation in an adoption wherein he or she does not consent. The Circuit Court shall determine if a biological living parent is indigent and, therefore, entitled to counsel pursuant KRS Chapter 31. If the Circuit Court so finds, the Circuit Court shall inform the indigent parent; and, upon request, if it appears reasonably necessary in the interest of justice, the Circuit Court shall appoint an attorney to represent the biological living parent pursuant to KRS Chapter 31 to be provided or paid for by:

The petitioner, a fee to be set by the court and not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500); or

The Finance and Administration Cabinet if the petitioner is a blood relative or fictive kin as established in KRS 199.470(4)(a), a fee to be set by the court and not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 242, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 57, § 18, effective March 17, 1998; 2018 ch. 159, § 35, effective July 14, 2018.

199.503.
Putative father registry — Administrative regulations — Registration — Notification of opportunity to register — Data storage — Certified copy of registration form — Confidentiality — Information on Web site.

The General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky hereby finds and declares that the purpose of the putative father registry established pursuant to this section is to determine the name and address of a father whose name and address have not been disclosed by the mother of the child, on or before the date the mother executes a consent to the child’s adoption to an attorney or an agency that is arranging the adoption of the child, and who may have conceived a child for whom a petition for adoption has been or may be filed so that notice of the adoption may be provided to the putative father.

As used in this section, “putative father” means a male who may be a child’s father, but who:

Is not married to the child’s mother on or before the date that the child is born;

Has not established paternity of the child in a court or agency proceeding in this or another state before the filing of a petition for adoption of the child; or

Has not completed an acknowledgment of paternity affidavit before the filing of a petition for adoption of the child.

The cabinet shall establish a putative father registry and promulgate administrative regulations to administer the registry in accordance with this section.

A putative father may register with the putative father registry by providing the following information to the cabinet:
(4) (a)

A putative father may register with the putative father registry by providing the following information to the cabinet:

The putative father’s name, date of birth, place of birth, place of residence, and an address at which he may be served with notice of the filing of a petition for adoption;

The mother’s name, date of birth, place of birth, place of residence, and mailing address, if known; and

Any other information described in subsection (5) of this section that is known to the putative father.

A putative father who registers under this section is responsible for:

Verifying with the cabinet the accuracy of the registration; and

Submitting to the cabinet an amended registration each time the information supplied by the putative father changes.

A putative father who has registered pursuant to this section may revoke a registration at any time.

The cabinet shall maintain the following information in the putative father registry:

The putative father’s name, date of birth, place of birth, place of residence, and an address at which he may be served with notice of the filing of a petition for adoption;

The mother’s name, date of birth, place of birth, place of residence, and mailing address, if known;

The child’s name, date of birth, and place of birth, if known;

The date that the cabinet receives a putative father’s registration;

The name of any attorney or agency that requests the cabinet to search the registry pursuant to KRS 199.505 and the date of the request; and

Any other information that the cabinet determines is necessary to access the information in the registry.

If a child’s mother provides the name of a potential putative father and his place of residence and mailing address, if known, to the cabinet, the cabinet shall, to the best of its ability, notify the potential putative father to inform him of his opportunity to register with the putative father registry.

The cabinet shall store the registry’s data so that it is accessible under the following:

The putative father’s name;

The mother’s name; or

The child’s name.

Subject to subsection (9) of this section, the cabinet shall furnish a certified copy of a putative father’s registration form upon written request by:

A putative father;

A mother;

A child;

Any party or attorney of record in a pending adoption;

An attorney who represents:

Prospective adoptive parents;

Petitioners in an adoption;

A mother;

A putative father; or

A child-placing agency;

A licensed child-placing agency that represents:

Prospective adoptive parents;

Petitioners in an adoption;

A mother; or

A putative father; or

A court that presides over a pending adoption.

The cabinet may release the certified copy of the registration form to a person under subsection (8)(a) to (c) of this section only if the information contained in the registration form names the requesting person.

A person who makes a request pursuant to this section shall state that the requesting person is entitled to receive the information under this section. The cabinet may charge a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) to a person who makes a request under this section. The fee established by this subsection shall not apply to a court.

Except as otherwise provided in this section and KRS 199.505, information contained within the registry is confidential.

The cabinet shall publish information regarding the putative father registry on its Web site.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 159, § 28, effective July 14, 2018.

199.505.
Request for search of putative father registry — Service of notice — Affidavit and registration form provided to requesting party — Adoption not granted unless affidavit filed with court — Exceptions.

An attorney or child-placing agency that arranges a prospective adoption may at any time request that the cabinet search the putative father registry established under KRS 199.503 to determine whether a putative father is registered in relation to a mother whose child is the subject of the adoption.

An attorney or child-placing agency that arranges a prospective adoption may at any time serve the putative father of a child or cause the putative father to be served with actual notice that the mother of the child is considering an adoptive placement for the child.

Beginning July 14, 2018, whenever a petition for adoption is filed, the attorney or child-placing agency that arranges the adoption shall request that the cabinet search the putative father registry at least one (1) day after the expiration of the period specified by KRS 199.480(1)(b)2.

No later than five (5) days after receiving a request under subsection (1) or (3) of this section, the cabinet shall submit an affidavit to the requesting party verifying whether a putative father is registered in relation to a mother whose child is the subject of the adoption.

Whenever the cabinet finds that one (1) or more putative fathers are registered, the cabinet shall submit a copy of each registration form with its affidavit.

A court shall not grant an adoption unless the cabinet’s affidavit under this section is filed with the court.

An adoption involving a foreign-born child, an adoption initiated out-of-state, or a public agency adoption shall not be subject to the requirements of this section.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 159, § 29, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 33, § 6, effective March 19, 2019.

199.510.
Investigation and report.

Upon filing a petition for the adoption of a minor child, the clerk of the court shall forward two (2) copies of the petition to the cabinet. The cabinet, or any person, agency or institution designated by it or the court shall, to the extent of available facilities, investigate and report in writing to the court:

Whether the contents of the petition required by KRS 199.490 are true;

Whether the proposed adoptive parents are financially able and morally fit to have the care, custody and training of the child; and

Whether the adoption is to the best interest of the child and the child is suitable for adoption.

The report of the cabinet or the designated person, agency or institution shall be filed with the court as soon as practicable but not later than ninety (90) days from the placement of the child or ninety (90) days after the filing date of the petition, whichever is longer, unless for good cause the court by written order extends the period of time for filing the report. If the cabinet or the designated person, agency or institution is unable to make the report, it shall within ten (10) days of receipt of the petition notify the court of its inability to conduct the investigation, and the court may designate some other person, agency or institution to make the necessary investigation. If the court designates some other person, agency or institution, the clerk shall forward one (1) copy of the petition to such person, agency or institution and shall notify the cabinet of such other designation at the time he forwards the petition to the cabinet.

If the cabinet is a party defendant, its reports, if it files no other pleadings, shall be considered its answer to the petition.

The clerk’s fee for copying and forwarding the copies of the petitions required by this section shall be taxed as a cost of the action.

History.
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 125, § 14; 1956, ch. 157, § 12; 1974, ch. 121, § 2; 1994, ch. 242, § 7, effective July 15, 1994.

199.515.
Hearing — Notice.

After the report of the guardian ad litem, if any, for the child and the report required by KRS 199.510 have been filed, the court at any time on motion of its own or that of any interested party may set a time for a hearing on the petition to be conducted in chambers in privacy, except as hereinafter provided. Notice of the hearing shall be given to all necessary parties at least ten (10) days in advance thereof, unless such parties shall have answered and agreed to the adoption or have failed to answer and the time for answering has expired, or shall have waived notice of the hearing. All necessary parties may be present and at least one (1) of the adopting parents and the guardian ad litem, if any, for the child must be present at the hearing.

History.
Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 157, § 13.